Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Article 1. Emergency Management Law.

§ 33-15-1.
Short title.

This article may be cited as the “Mississippi Emergency Management Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8610-01; Laws, 1942, ch. 206; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 9, 1980).

§ 33-15-2.
Legislative findings and declaration of intent.

The Legislature finds and declares that the state is vulnerable to a wide range of emergencies, including natural, technological and man-made disasters, all of which threaten the life, health and safety of its people; damage and destroy property; disrupt services and everyday business and recreational activities; and impede economic growth and development. The Legislature further finds that this vulnerability is exacerbated by the growth in the state’s number of persons with special needs. This growth has greatly complicated the state’s ability to coordinate its emergency management resources and activities.

It is the intent of the Legislature to reduce the vulnerability of the people and property of this state; to prepare for efficient evacuation and shelter of threatened or affected persons; to provide for the rapid and orderly provision of relief to persons and for the coordination of activities relating to emergency preparedness, response, recovery and mitigation among and between agencies and officials of this state, with similar agencies and officials of other states, with local and federal governments, with interstate organizations and with the private sector.

It is further the intent of the Legislature to promote the state’s emergency preparedness, response, recovery and mitigation capabilities through enhanced coordination, long-term planning and adequate funding. State policy for responding to disasters is to support local emergency response efforts. In the case of a major or catastrophic disaster, however, the needs of residents and communities will likely be greater than local resources. In these situations, the state must be capable of providing effective, coordinated and timely support to communities and the public. Therefore, the Legislature determines and declares that the provisions of this article fulfill an important state interest.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 333, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 33-15-3.
Policy and purpose.

Because of the existing and increasing possibility of the occurrence of disasters or emergencies of unprecedented size and destructiveness resulting from enemy attack, sabotage or other hostile action, and from natural, man-made or technological disasters, and in order to insure that preparations of this state will be adequate to deal with, reduce vulnerability to, and recover from such disasters or emergencies, and generally to provide for the common defense and to protect the public peace, health and safety, and to preserve the lives and property of the people of this state, it is hereby found and declared necessary: (1) To create a state emergency management agency, and to authorize the creation of local organizations for emergency management in the municipalities and counties of the state, and to authorize cooperation with the federal government and the governments of other states; (2) to confer upon the Governor, the agency and upon the executive heads or governing bodies of the municipalities and counties of the state the emergency powers provided herein; (3) to provide for the rendering of mutual aid among the municipalities and counties of the state, and with other states, and with the federal government with respect to the carrying out of emergency management functions and responsibilities; (4) to authorize the establishment of such organizations and the development and employment of such measures as are necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this article; and (5) to provide the means to assist in the prevention or mitigation of emergencies which may be caused or aggravated by inadequate planning for, and regulation of, public and private facilities and land use.

It is further declared to be the purpose of this article and the policy of the state that all emergency management functions of this state be coordinated, to the maximum extent, with the comparable functions of the federal government, including its various departments and agencies, of other states and localities, and of private agencies of every type, to the end that the most effective preparation and use may be made of the nation’s manpower, resources, and facilities for dealing with any disaster or emergency, or both, that may occur as enumerated in this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8610-02; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 2; Laws, 1962, ch. 482, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 333, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 33-15-5.
Definitions.

The following words, whenever used in this article shall, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context, have the following meanings:

“Agency” means the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency, created by Section 33-15-7.

“Director” means the Director of Emergency Management, appointed pursuant to Section 33-15-7.

“Emergency management” means the preparation for, the mitigation of, the response to, and the recovery from emergencies and disasters. Specific emergency management responsibilities include, but are not limited to:

Reduction of vulnerability of people and communities of this state to damage, injury and loss of life and property resulting from natural, technological or man-made emergencies or hostile military paramilitary action.

Preparation for prompt and efficient response and recovery to protect lives and property affected by emergencies.

Response to emergencies using all systems, plans and resources necessary to preserve adequately the health, safety and welfare of persons or property affected by the emergency.

Recovery from emergencies by providing for the rapid and orderly start of restoration and rehabilitation of persons and property affected by emergencies.

Provision of an emergency management system embodying all aspects of preemergency preparedness and postemergency response, recovery and mitigation.

Assistance in anticipation, recognition, appraisal, prevention and mitigation of emergencies which may be caused or aggravated by inadequate planning for, and regulation of public and private facilities and land use.

“Civil defense,” whenever it appears in the laws of the State of Mississippi, shall mean “emergency management” unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

“State of war emergency” means the condition which exists immediately, with or without a proclamation thereof by the Governor, whenever this state or nation is attacked by an enemy of the United States or upon receipt by the state of a warning from the federal government indicating that such an attack is probable or imminent.

“State of emergency” means the duly proclaimed existence of conditions of disaster or extreme peril to the safety of persons or property within the state caused by air or water pollution, fire, flood, storm, epidemic, earthquake, hurricane, resource shortages, or other natural or man-made conditions other than conditions causing a “state of war emergency,” which conditions by reasons of their magnitude are or are likely to be beyond the control of the services, personnel, equipment and facilities of any single county and/or municipality and requires combined forces of the state to combat.

“Local emergency” means the duly proclaimed existence of conditions of disaster or extreme peril to the safety of persons and property within the territorial limits of a county and/or municipality caused by such conditions as air or water pollution, fire, flood, storm, epidemic, earthquake, hurricane, resource shortages or other natural or man-made conditions, which conditions are or are likely to be beyond the control of the services, personnel, equipment and facilities of the political subdivision and require the combined forces of other subdivisions or of the state to combat.

“Emergency” means any occurrence, or threat thereof, whether natural, technological, or man-made, in war or in peace, which results or may result in substantial injury or harm to the population or substantial damage to or loss of property.

“Man-made emergency” means an emergency caused by an action against persons or society, including, but not limited to, emergency attack, sabotage, terrorism, civil unrest or other action impairing the orderly administration of government.

“Natural emergency” means an emergency caused by a natural event, including, but not limited to, a hurricane, a storm, a flood, severe wave action, a drought or an earthquake.

“Technological emergency” means an emergency caused by a technological failure or accident, including, but not limited to, an explosion, transportation accident, radiological accident, or chemical or other hazardous material incident.

“Local emergency management agency” means an organization created to discharge the emergency management responsibilities and functions of a political subdivision.

“Disaster” means any natural, technological or civil emergency as defined in this section that causes damage of sufficient severity and magnitude to result in a declaration of an emergency by a county or municipality, the Governor or the President of the United States. Disasters shall be identified by the severity of resulting damage, as follows:

“Catastrophic disaster” means a disaster that will require massive state and federal assistance, including immediate military involvement.

“Major disaster” means a disaster that will likely exceed local capabilities and require a broad range of state and federal assistance.

“Minor disaster” means a disaster that is likely to be within the response capabilities of local government and to result in only a minimal need for state or federal assistance.

“Disaster Reservist” means any person hired on a temporary basis pursuant to State Personnel Board policies and procedures regulating personal service contracts, that is hired to perform specific tasks related to a Governor’s State of Emergency, or by an emergency or disaster declaration of the President of the United States, by the agency, and is assigned to perform such duties as may be required under the direction of the appropriate agency supervisor.

“Emergency impact area” means the area of the state in which market conditions exist due to a state of emergency creating a likelihood that prices ordinarily charged for goods and services could be raised unfairly due to the underlying emergency.

“Political subdivision” means a local government created by the State of Mississippi to assist in fulfilling the state’s obligations. The term “political subdivision” includes levee districts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8610-03, 8610-04; Laws, 1942, ch. 206; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, §§ 3, 4; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 3; Laws, 1983, ch. 420, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 333, § 3; Laws, 1998, ch. 338, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 413, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 433, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 434, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 33-15-7.
Mississippi Emergency Management Agency established; director and other personnel.

There is hereby created within the executive branch of the state government a department called the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency with a director of emergency management who shall be appointed by the Governor; he shall hold office during the pleasure of the Governor and shall be compensated as determined by any appropriation that may be made by the Legislature for such purposes.

The director, with the approval of the Governor, may employ such technical, clerical, stenographic and other personnel, to be compensated as provided in any appropriation that may be made for such purpose, and may make such expenditures within the appropriation therefor, or from other funds made available to him for purposes of emergency management, as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this article.

The director and other personnel of the emergency management agency shall be provided with appropriate office space, furniture, equipment, supplies, stationery and printing in the same manner as provided for other state agencies.

The director, subject to the direction and control of the Governor, shall be the executive head of the emergency management agency and shall be responsible to the Governor for carrying out the program for emergency management of this state. He shall coordinate the activities of all organizations for emergency management within the state, and shall maintain liaison with and cooperate with emergency management agencies and organizations of other states and of the federal government, and shall have such additional authority, duties, and responsibilities authorized by this article as may be prescribed by the Governor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8610-04; Laws, 1942, ch. 206; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 4; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 4; Laws, 1995, ch. 333, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 33-15-9.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1995, ch. 333, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§33-15-9. [Codes, 1942, § 8610-05; Laws, 1942, ch. 206; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 5; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 5]

§ 33-15-11.
Emergency management powers of Governor.

The Governor shall have general direction and control of the activities of the Emergency Management Agency and Council and shall be responsible for the carrying out of the provisions of this article, and in the event of a man-made, technological or natural disaster or emergency beyond local control, may assume direct operational control over all or any part of the emergency management functions within this state.

In performing his duties under this article, the Governor is further authorized and empowered:

To make, amend and rescind the necessary orders, rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this article with due consideration of the plans of the federal government, and to enter into disaster assistance grants and agreements with the federal government under the terms as may be required by federal law.

To work with the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency in preparing a comprehensive plan and program for the emergency management of this state, such plan and program to be integrated into and coordinated with the emergency management plans of the federal government and of other states to the fullest possible extent, and to coordinate the preparation of plans and programs for emergency management by the political subdivisions of this state, such local plans to be integrated into and coordinated with the emergency management plan and program of this state to the fullest possible extent.

In accordance with such plan and program for emergency management of this state, to ascertain the requirements of the state or the political subdivisions thereof for food or clothing or other necessities of life in the event of attack or natural or man-made or technological disasters and to plan for and procure supplies, medicines, materials and equipment, and to use and employ from time to time any of the property, services and resources within the state, for the purposes set forth in this article; to make surveys of the industries, resources and facilities within the state as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this article; to institute training programs and public information programs, and to take all other preparatory steps, including the partial or full mobilization of emergency management organizations in advance of actual disaster, to insure the furnishing of adequately trained and equipped forces of emergency management personnel in time of need.

To cooperate with the President and the heads of the Armed Forces, and the Emergency Management Agency of the United States, and with the officers and agencies of other states in matters pertaining to the emergency management of the state and nation and the incidents thereof; and in connection therewith, to take any measures which he may deem proper to carry into effect any request of the President and the appropriate federal officers and agencies, for any action looking to emergency management, including the direction or control of (a) blackouts and practice blackouts, air raid drills, mobilization of emergency management forces, and other tests and exercises, (b) warnings and signals for drills or attacks and the mechanical devices to be used in connection therewith, (c) the effective screening or extinguishing of all lights and lighting devices and appliances, (d) shutting off water mains, gas mains, electric power connections and the suspension of all other utility services, (e) the conduct of civilians and the movement and cessation of movement of pedestrians and vehicular traffic during, prior and subsequent to drills or attack, (f) public meetings or gatherings under emergency conditions, and (g) the evacuation and reception of the civilian population.

To take such action and give such directions to state and local law enforcement officers and agencies as may be reasonable and necessary for the purpose of securing compliance with the provisions of this article and with the orders, rules and regulations made pursuant thereto.

To employ such measures and give such directions to the state or local boards of health as may be reasonably necessary for the purpose of securing compliance with the provisions of this article or with the findings or recommendations of such boards of health by reason of conditions arising from enemy attack or the threat of enemy attack or natural, man-made or technological disaster.

To utilize the services and facilities of existing officers and agencies of the state and of the political subdivisions thereof; and all such officers and agencies shall cooperate with and extend their services and facilities to the Governor as he may request.

To establish agencies and offices and to appoint executive, technical, clerical and other personnel as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this article including, with due consideration to the recommendation of the local authorities, part-time or full-time state and regional area directors.

To delegate any authority vested in him under this article, and to provide for the subdelegation of any such authority.

On behalf of this state to enter into reciprocal aid agreements or compacts with other states and the federal government, either on a statewide basis or local political subdivision basis or with a neighboring state or province of a foreign country. Such mutual aid arrangements shall be limited to the furnishings or exchange of food, clothing, medicine and other supplies; engineering services; emergency housing; police services; national or state guards while under the control of the state; health, medical and related services; firefighting, rescue, transportation and construction services and equipment; personnel necessary to provide or conduct these services; and such other supplies, equipment, facilities, personnel and services as may be needed; the reimbursement of costs and expenses for equipment, supplies, personnel and similar items for mobile support units, firefighting and police units and health units; and on such terms and conditions as are deemed necessary.

To sponsor and develop mutual aid plans and agreements between the political subdivisions of the state, similar to the mutual aid arrangements with other states referred to above.

To collect information and data for assessment of vulnerabilities and capabilities within the borders of Mississippi as it pertains to the nation and state’s security and homeland defense. This information shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act, Section 25-61-1 et seq.

Authorize any agency or arm of the state to create a special emergency management revolving fund, accept donations, contributions, fees, grants, including federal funds, as may be necessary for such agency or arm of the state to administer its functions of this article as set forth in the Executive Order of the Governor.

To authorize the Commissioner of Public Safety to select, train, organize and equip a ready reserve of auxiliary highway patrolmen.

To suspend or limit the sale, dispensing or transportation of alcoholic beverages, firearms, explosives and combustibles.

To control, restrict and regulate by rationing, freezing, use of quotas, prohibitions on shipments, price-fixing, allocation or other means, the use, sale or distribution of food, feed, fuel, clothing and other commodities, materials, goods or services.

To proclaim a state of emergency in an area affected or likely to be affected thereby when he finds that the conditions described in Section 33-15-5(g) exist, or when he is requested to do so by the mayor of a municipality or by the president of the board of supervisors of a county, or when he finds that a local authority is unable to cope with the emergency. Such proclamation shall be in writing and shall take effect immediately upon its execution by the Governor. As soon thereafter as possible, such proclamation shall be filed with the Secretary of State and be given widespread notice and publicity. The Governor, upon advice of the director, shall review the need for continuing the state of emergency at least every thirty (30) days until the emergency is terminated and shall proclaim a reduction of area or the termination of the state of emergency at the earliest possible date that conditions warrant.

To declare an emergency impact area when he finds that the conditions described in Section 33-15-5(o) exist. The proclamation shall be in writing and shall take effect immediately upon its execution by the Governor. As soon as possible, the proclamation shall be filed with the Secretary of State and be given widespread notice and publicity. The Governor shall review the need for continuing the declaration of emergency impact area at least every thirty (30) days until the emergency is terminated, and shall proclaim the reduction of the emergency impact area or termination of the declaration of emergency impact area at the earliest date or dates possible.

In addition to the powers conferred upon the Governor in this section, the Legislature hereby expressly delegates to the Governor the following powers and duties in the event of an impending enemy attack, an enemy attack, or a man-made, technological or natural disaster where such disaster is beyond local control:

To suspend the provisions of any regulatory statute prescribing the procedures for conduct of state business, or the orders, rules or regulations of any state agency, if strict compliance with the provisions of any statute, order, rule or regulation would in any way prevent, hinder or delay necessary action in coping with a disaster or emergency.

To transfer the direction, personnel or functions of state agencies, boards, commissions or units thereof for the purpose of performing or facilitating disaster or emergency services.

To commandeer or utilize any private property if necessary to cope with a disaster or emergency, provided that such private property so commandeered or utilized shall be paid for under terms and conditions agreed upon by the participating parties. The owner of said property shall immediately be given a receipt for the said private property and said receipt shall serve as a valid claim against the Treasury of the State of Mississippi for the agreed upon market value of said property.

To perform and exercise such other functions, powers and duties as may be necessary to promote and secure the safety and protection of the civilian population in coping with a disaster or emergency.

This section does not authorize the Governor or a designee of the Governor to act in contravention of Section 33-7-303.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8610-06; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 6; Laws, 1962, ch. 482, § 2; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 6; Laws, 1983, ch. 420, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 333, § 5; Laws, 2000, ch. 413, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 473, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 433, § 3; Laws, 2014, ch. 443, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 33-15-13.
Emergency powers of Governor.

In the event of actual or impending enemy attack, as determined by the President, against the United States and the State of Mississippi, the Governor may proclaim that a state of war emergency exists, and thereafter the Governor shall have and may exercise for such period as such state of war emergency exists or continues, the following additional emergency powers:

To enforce all laws, rules and regulations relating to emergency management and to assume direct operational control of all emergency management forces and helpers in the state;

To purchase supplies and services for emergency management purposes, including aiding the populace, without necessity for advertising therefor; to call upon all persons, firms and corporations to furnish such supplies, services and facilities as they may control which may be needed for the protection of the public, and to enter into all necessary contracts and agreements as may be necessary with relation thereto, all or any provisions of law with reference to advertisements in such matters being expressly waived for this purpose;

To utilize or commandeer any private property for the protection of the public or at the request of the President, the Armed Forces or the Emergency Management Agency of the United States including:

To sell, lend, give or distribute all or any such personal property utilized among the inhabitants of the state and to account to the State Treasurer for any funds received for such property;

To perform and exercise such other functions, powers and duties as may be deemed necessary to promote and secure the safety and protection of the civilian population.

For use during emergency only, all means of transportation and communication, except newspapers, or publications, or wire facilities leased or owned by news services, newspapers and other news publications;

Food, clothing, equipment, materials, medicines, any supplies and stocks of fuel of whatever nature;

Facilities including buildings and plants, for use during emergency only; in the event it shall become necessary to utilize any such facilities, plants or services, the operation thereof, if possible, shall be left in the hands of the owner, subject to direction of the Governor, and only such portion as may be essential for the protection of life and property, or the national defense, shall be commandeered or utilized;

Adequate compensation shall be paid for any property so utilized, taken or condemned. In case it shall become necessary to take or use any private property as provided above, the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi shall be pledged to pay just compensation therefor. In case the Governor and the owner of any such property so utilized or taken shall not be able to agree on the compensation to be paid for use, damage or taking thereof, the amount of such compensation to be paid shall be determined in conformity with the statutes of this state relating to eminent domain procedures.

All powers granted to the Governor by this section with respect to a state of war emergency shall terminate when the state of war emergency has been terminated by proclamation of the Governor or by concurrent resolution of the Legislature declaring it at an end.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8610-07; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 7; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 7; Laws, 1983, ch. 420, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 333, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 33-15-14.
Preparation and maintenance of state comprehensive emergency management plan.

The agency is responsible for maintaining a comprehensive statewide program of emergency management. The agency is responsible for coordination with efforts of the federal government with other departments and agencies of state government, with county and municipal governments and school boards and with private agencies that have a role in emergency management.

In performing its duties under this article, the agency shall:

Work with the Governor, or his representative, in preparing a State Comprehensive Emergency Management Plan of this state, which shall be integrated into and coordinated with the emergency management plans of the federal government and of other states to the fullest possible extent, and to coordinate the preparation of plans and programs for emergency management by the political subdivisions of the state, such local plans to be integrated into and coordinated with the emergency plan and program of this state. The plan must contain provisions to ensure that the state is prepared for emergencies and minor, major and catastrophic disasters, and the agency shall work closely with local governments and agencies and organizations with emergency management responsibilities in preparing and maintaining the plan. The State Comprehensive Emergency Management Plan will be operations oriented and:

Include an evacuation component that includes specific regional and interregional planning provisions and promotes intergovernmental coordination of evacuation activities. This component must, at a minimum: ensure coordination pertaining to evacuees crossing county lines; set forth procedures for directing people caught on evacuation routes to safe shelter; and establish policies and strategies for emergency medical evacuations.

Include a shelter component that includes specific regional and interregional planning provisions and promotes coordination of shelter activities between the public, private and nonprofit sectors. This component must, at a minimum: contain strategies to ensure the availability of adequate public shelter space in each region of the state; establish strategies for refuge-of-last-resort programs; provide strategies to assist local emergency management efforts to ensure that adequate staffing plans exist for all shelters, including medical and security personnel; provide for a postdisaster communications system for public shelters; establish model shelter guidelines for operations, registration, inventory, power generation capability, information management and staffing; and set forth policy guidance for sheltering people with special needs.

Include a postdisaster response and recovery component that includes specific regional and interregional planning provisions and promotes intergovernmental coordination of postdisaster response and recovery activities. This component must provide for postdisaster response and recovery strategies according to whether a disaster is minor, major or catastrophic. The postdisaster response and recovery component must, at a minimum: establish the structure of the state’s postdisaster response and recovery organization; establish procedures for activating the state’s plan; set forth policies used to guide postdisaster response and recovery activities; describe the chain of command during the postdisaster response and recovery period; describe initial and continuous postdisaster response and recovery actions; identify the roles and responsibilities of each involved agency and organization; provide for a comprehensive communications plan; establish procedures for monitoring mutual aid agreements; provide for rapid impact assessment teams; ensure the availability of an effective statewide urban search and rescue program coordinated with the fire services; ensure the existence of a comprehensive statewide medical care and relief plan administered by the State Department of Health; and establish systems for coordinating volunteers and accepting and distributing donated funds and goods.

Include additional provisions addressing aspects of preparedness, response and recovery, as determined necessary by the agency.

Address the need for coordinated and expeditious deployment of state resources, including the Mississippi National Guard. In the case of an imminent major disaster, procedures should address predeployment of the Mississippi National Guard, and, in the case of an imminent catastrophic disaster, procedures should address predeployment of the Mississippi National Guard and the United States Armed Forces. This subparagraph (v) does not authorize the agency to call out and deploy the Mississippi National Guard, which authority and determination rests solely with the Governor.

Establish a system of communications and warning to ensure that the state’s population and emergency management agencies are warned of developing emergency situations and can communicate emergency response decisions.

Establish guidelines and schedules for annual exercises that evaluate the ability of the state and its political subdivisions to respond to minor, major and catastrophic disasters and support local emergency management agencies. Such exercises shall be coordinated with local governments and, to the extent possible, the federal government.

1. Assign lead and support responsibilities to state agencies and personnel for emergency support functions and other support activities.

2. The agency shall prepare an interim postdisaster response and recovery component that substantially complies with the provisions of this paragraph (a). Each state agency assigned lead responsibility for an emergency support function by the State Comprehensive Emergency Management Plan shall also prepare a detailed operational plan needed to implement its responsibilities. The complete State Comprehensive Emergency Management Plan shall be submitted to the Governor no later than January 1, 1996, and on January 1 of every even-numbered year thereafter.

Adopt standards and requirements for county emergency management plans. The standards and requirements must ensure that county plans are coordinated and consistent with the State Comprehensive Emergency Management Plan. If a municipality elects to establish an emergency management program, it must adopt a city emergency management plan that complies with all standards and requirements applicable to county emergency management plans.

Assist political subdivisions in preparing and maintaining emergency management plans.

Review periodically political subdivision emergency management plans for consistency with the State Comprehensive Emergency Management Plan and standards and requirements adopted under this section.

Make recommendations to the Legislature, building code organizations and political subdivisions for zoning, building and other land use controls, safety measures for securing mobile homes or other nonpermanent or semipermanent structures; and other preparedness, prevention and mitigation measures designed to eliminate emergencies or reduce their impact.

In accordance with the State Comprehensive Emergency Management Plan and program for emergency management, ascertain the requirements of the state, its political subdivisions and the Mississippi Band of Choctaw Indians for equipment and supplies of all kinds in the event of an emergency; plan for and either procure supplies, medicines, materials and equipment or enter into memoranda of agreement or open purchase orders that will ensure their availability; and use and employ from time to time any of the property, services and resources within the state in accordance with this article.

Anticipate trends and promote innovations that will enhance the emergency management system.

Prepare and distribute to appropriate state and local officials catalogs of federal, state and private assistance programs.

Implement training programs to improve the ability of state and local emergency management personnel to prepare and implement emergency management plans and programs, and require all local civil defense directors or emergency management directors to complete such training as a condition to their authority to continue service in their emergency management positions.

Review periodically emergency operating procedures of state agencies and recommend revisions as needed to ensure consistency with the State Comprehensive Emergency Management Plan and program.

Prepare, in advance whenever possible, such executive orders, proclamations and rules for issuance by the Governor as are necessary or appropriate for coping with emergencies and disasters.

Cooperate with the federal government and any public or private agency or entity in achieving any purpose of this article.

Assist political subdivisions with the creation and training of urban search and rescue teams and promote the development and maintenance of a state urban search and rescue program.

Delegate, as necessary and appropriate, authority vested in it under this article and provide for the subdelegation of such authority.

Require each county or municipality to designate an agent for working with the agency in the event of a natural disaster. The county or municipality may designate any person as agent who has completed training programs required of emergency management directors.

Report biennially to the Governor and the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, no later than January 1 of every odd-numbered year, the status of the emergency management capabilities of the state and its political subdivisions.

In accordance with Section 25-43-1 et seq., create, implement, administer, promulgate, amend and rescind rules, programs and plans needed to carry out the provisions of this article with due consideration for, and in cooperating with, the plans and programs of the federal government.

Have the sole power and discretion to enter into, sign, execute and deliver long-term or multiyear leases of real and personal property with other state and federal agencies.

Do other things necessary, incidental or appropriate for the implementation of this article.

In accordance with Section 33-15-15, create, implement, administer, promulgate, amend and rescind rules regarding the development of the Mississippi Disaster Reservist Program.

Unless otherwise instructed by the Governor, sponsor and develop mutual aid plans and agreements between the political subdivisions of the state and the Mississippi Band of Choctaw Indians similar to the mutual aid arrangements with other states referenced in Section 33-15-11(b) (10).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 333, § 7; Laws, 2000, ch. 413, § 3; Laws, 2002, ch. 475, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 302, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 434, § 3; Laws, 2015, ch. 336, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2015).